Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7434.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 17-19 of the General Laws entitled "Conduct of Election and Voting
Equipment, and Supplies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
17-19-55. Voting interference.
Federal Immigration and Customs Enforcement employees, agents, or officials shall not
enter or remain within two hundred feet (200') of any polling place at which voting is being
conducted, including both early voting and election day voting, except when such Federal
Immigration and Customs employee, agent or official is present to vote in compliance with all
applicable law, rules and regulations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004030/SUB A
========